North Carolina statutes. Chapter 9. Jurors.
Article 5. Discharge of Jurors Prohibited.

§ 9-32.
Discharge of juror unlawful.

No employer may discharge or demote any employee because the employee has been called for jury duty, or is serving as a grand juror or petit juror.

Any employer who violates any provision of this section shall be liable in a civil action for reasonable damages suffered by an employee as a result of the violation, and an employee discharged or demoted in violation of this section shall be entitled to be reinstated to his former position. The burden of proof shall be upon the employee.

The statute of limitations for actions under this section shall be one year pursuant to

G.S. 1-54

.

History.

1987, c. 702, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina Employment Law After Coman: Reaffirming Basic Rights in the Workplace,” see 24 Wake Forest L. Rev. 905 (1989).